nl: Bevestigingsmateriaal: Vrijstaand; Handbediend; Hanger; Haak; Schroeven; Zuignap; Andere
el: Υλικό τοποθέτησης: Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Χειροκίνητη; Κρεμάστρα; Άγκιστρο; Βίδες; Βεντούζα; Άλλο
nb: Monteringsmaskinvare: Frittstående; Håndholdt; Henger; Krok; Skruer; Sugekopp; Annen
ja: 取り付け金具: 自立型; ハンドヘルド; ハンガー; フック; ネジ; 吸盤; その他
es: Accesorios de montaje: Independiente; Portátil; Percha; Gancho; Tornillos; Ventosa; Otros
sv: Monteringsutrustning: Fristående; Handhållen; Galge; Krok; Skruvar; Sugkopp; Annat
ko: 장착 하드웨어: 독립형; 휴대용; 행거; 후크; 나사; 석션 컵; 기타
hr-HR: Montažna oprema: Samostojeće; Ručno; Vješalica; Kuka; Vijci; Prianjaljka; Ostalo
fr: Matériau du montage: Sur pied; Portatif; Cintre; Crochet; Vis; Ventouse; Autre
hu: Rögzítőelemek: Szabadon álló; Kézi; Akasztó; Horog; Csavarok; Tapadókorong; Egyéb
pl: Sprzęt montażowy: Wolnostojący; Mobilny; Wieszak; Zaczep; Śruby; Przyssawka; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Hardware de montagem: Sem suporte; Portátil; Cabide; Gancho; Parafusos; Copo de sucção; Outro
fi: Asennuslaitteisto: Vapaasti seisova; Kädessä pidettävä; Ripustin; Koukku; Ruuvit; Imukuppi; Muu
tr: Montaj donanımı: Bağımsız; Elde taşınan; Askı; Kanca; Vidalar; Vantuz; Diğer
bg-BG: Монтажен хардуер: Свободностоящ; Преносим; Закачалка; Кука; Винтове; Смукателна чаша; Други
ru: Крепежные приспособления: Отдельно стоящий; Ручной; Подвесной; На крючках; На винтах; На присоске; Другой
zh-CN: 安装五金件: 自力支撑; 手持式; 吊架; 钩子; 螺钉; 吸盘; 其他
sl-SI: Montažna oprema: Prostostoječe; Ročno; Obešalnik; Kavelj; Vijaki; Prisesek; Drugo
de: Montagezubehör: Freistehend; Handgerät; Aufhänger; Haken; Schrauben; Saugnapf; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Hardware de montagem: Sem suporte; Dispositivo portátil; Cabide; Gancho; Parafusos; Copo de sucção; Outro
da: Monteringshardware: Fritstående; Håndholdt; Bøjle; Krog; Skruer; Sugekop; Andet
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์สำหรับติดตั้ง: ตั้งพื้น; แบบมือถือ; ไม้แขวน; ตะขอ; สกรูยึด; ยางดูด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Montážny hardvér: Voľne stojaci; Ručný; Vešiak; Háčik; Skrutky; Prísavka; Iné
ro-RO: Feronerie pentru montare: De sine stătător; De mână; Agățător; Cârlig; Șuruburi; Ventuză; Altele
vi: Phần cứng lắp ghép: Đứng một mình; Cầm tay; Mắc treo; Móc; Vít; Giác hút; Khác
zh-TW: 安裝硬體: 獨立式; 手持式; 衣架; 鉤子; 螺絲; 吸盤; 其他
it: Hardware da montare: Da posizionamento libero; A mano; Gancio; Gancio; Viti; Ventosa; Altro
en: Mounting hardware: Free-standing; Handheld; Hanger; Hook; Screws; Suction cup; Other
cs: Montážní hardware: Volně stojící; Ruční; Věšák; Hák; Šrouby; Přísavka; Jiné
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo įranga: Laisvai pastatoma; Rankinė; Kabinama; Su kabliuku; Su varžtais; Su siurbtuku; Kita